District of Columbia statutes.
42-3509.07

Termination.

All subchapters of this chapter, except subchapters III and V, shall terminate on December 31, 2020.

History

July 17, 1985, D.C. Law 6-10, § 907, 32 DCR 3089
Oct. 19, 1989, D.C. Law 8-48, § 2(c), 36 DCR 5788
Sept. 26, 1995, D.C. Law 11-52, § 818, 42 DCR 3684
Oct. 19, 2000, D.C. Law 13-172, § 1202(b), 47 DCR 6308
July 22, 2005, D.C. Law 16-10, § 2, 52 DCR 5244
Mar. 21, 2009, D.C. Law 17-319,§ 4(a), 56 DCR 214
Mar. 12, 2011, D.C. Law 18-328, § 2, 58 DCR 16
Sept. 26, 2012, D.C. Law 19-171, § 105, 59 DCR 6190

Effect of Amendments

D.C. Law 13-172 amended the termination date.
D.C. Law 16-10 rewrote the section which had read:
“All subchapters of this chapter, except subchapters III and V, shall terminate on December 31, 2005.”
D.C. Law 17-319 substituted “except subchapters III and V and § 42-3509.08” for “except subchapters III and V”.
D.C. Law 18-328 rewrote the section, which formerly read:
“All subchapters of this chapter, except subchapters III and V and § 42-3509.08, shall terminate on December 31, 2010.”
The 2012 amendment by D.C. Law 19-171 added “and § 42-3509.08.”

Temporary Amendment of Section

For temporary (225 day) amendment of section, see § 4(a) of Abatement of Nuisance Properties and Tenant Receivership Temporary amendment Act of 2008 (D.C. Law 17-237, October 21, 2008, law notification 55 DCR 11700).

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90-day) amendment of section, see § 1202(b) of the Fiscal Year 2001 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2000 (D.C. Act 13-376, July 24, 2000, 47 DCR 6574).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 1202(b) of the Fiscal Year 2001 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2000 (D.C. Act 13-438, October 20, 2000, 47 DCR 8740).
For temporary (90 day) amendment, see § 4(a) of Abatement of Nuisance Properties and Tenant Receivership Emergency Amendment Act of 2008 (D.C. Act 17-420, July 8, 2008, 55 DCR 7703).
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 4(b) of Abatement of Nuisance Properties and Tenant Receivership Emergency Amendment Act of 2008 (D.C. Act 17-420, July 8, 2008, 55 DCR 7703).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 4(a) of Abatement of Nuisance Properties and Tenant Receivership Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2008 (D.C. Act 17-563, October 27, 2008, 55 DCR 12019).
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 4(b) of Abatement of Nuisance Properties and Tenant Receivership Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2008 (D.C. Act 17-563, October 27, 2008, 55 DCR 12019).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 2 of Rental Housing Act Extension Emergency Amendment Act of 2010 (D.C. Act 18-675, December 28, 2010, 58 DCR 132).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 2 of Rental Housing Act Extension Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2011 (D.C. Act 19-31, March 15, 2011, 58 DCR 2604).